Utah statutes.
35A-4-107.   Limit of liability -- State -- Department.

(1)  Benefits shall be considered to be due and payable under this chapter only to the extent provided in this chapter and to the extent that moneys are available to the credit of the Unemployment Compensation Fund.

(2)  The state, the department, or any division of the department may not be held liable for any amount that exceeds the monies available in the Unemployment Compensation Fund.

